Hawaii, session 2026, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that more programs and resources are necessary to increase family resilience and reduce the risk of child abuse or neglect.  Many families at high risk of entering the child welfare system are unaware of available services or how to access them, or public benefits are not available to address the economic or other fiscal challenge they are facing. The malama ohana working group was established by Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, within the office of wellness and resilience to seek, design, and recommend transformative changes to the State's existing child welfare system.  In its report submitted to the 2025 legislature, the malama ohana working group stated there is a shortage of resources in Hawaii dedicated to preventing children and families' involvement with child welfare services, especially primary prevention and universal support.  The malama ohana working group recommended the establishment of primary prevention and universal support programs that are trauma-informed and culturally responsive in an effort to divert children and families away from involvement with the child welfare system. The legislature finds that community and school-based organizations are safe, accessible, and non-judgmental spaces where families can access formal and informal supports and referrals.  Providing family strengthening programming helps to increase parents' protective factors: parental resilience, social connections, concrete support, knowledge of parenting and child development, and social-emotional competence of children.  Community and school-based organizations, such as family resource centers, have been successful in reducing the number of families reported to the child welfare system. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish and fund a five-year family resilience pilot program within the office of wellness and resilience. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established within the office of wellness and resilience a family resilience pilot program, in which the office of wellness and resilience shall provide: (1)  Trauma-informed peer support navigators with lived experience who have gone through the social services system to assist families with enrollment in public or other benefits, family strengthening, and cultural programming; and (2)  Financial assistance and resource supports to aid with food, clothing, hygiene, housing, parenting, childcare, household, and transportation needs. (b)  The office of wellness and resilience, shall establish, no later than December 31, 2025, the following: (1)  Data and referral system tracking needs and protocols to comply with applicable state and federal laws; and (2)  An implementation and evaluation plan that includes specific, measurable, attainable, reasonable, and time-bound goals. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $987,150 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 20252026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of wellness and resilience to carry out the purposes of this Act, including the contracting of services to implement the pilot program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of wellness and resilience. SECTION 4.  This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2030. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST